Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-35,106
Hospital authority; bonds; signature; validation.

In case any of the officers whose signatures appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be such officers before the delivery of such bonds, such signatures shall, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if they had remained in office until such delivery.

Laws 1971, LB 54, § 33;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.106.